Florida, session 2026, SB1162.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSubsections (8) through (10) of section 11.92, 12 Florida Statutes, as created by SB ____, 2026 Regular Session, 13 are renumbered as subsections (9) through (11), respectively, 14 and a new subsection (8) is added to that section, to read: 15 11.92âOffice of the Corrections Ombudsman.â 16 (8)âCorrespondence and communications between incarcerated 17 persons or the public and the office, the Ombudsman, the members 18 of the committee, and office staff are confidential and exempt 19 from s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 20 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 21 necessity that correspondence and communications with the Office 22 of the Corrections Ombudsman and the Corrections Oversight 23 Committee be made confidential and exempt from s. 24(a), Article 24 I of the State Constitution. Public disclosure of such 25 correspondence and communications could jeopardize the safety of 26 incarcerated persons. It is essential to the functioning of the 27 office that incarcerated persons and the public feel free to 28 communicate with the office concerning conditions in and 29 operations of correctional facilities. The public records 30 exemption is necessary to protect incarcerated persons from 31 retaliation by correctional officers who are under investigation 32 as a result of communications with the office. 33 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 34 SB ___ or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 35 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 36 thereof and becomes a law.